District of Columbia statutes.
2-1535.02

Bullying prevention task force.

(a)

Within 90 days of September 14, 2012, the Mayor shall establish a bullying prevention task force.

(b)

(1)

The task force shall consist of representatives from a diversity of the educational institutions and agencies that will be affected by this subchapter, as well as community representatives, including:

(A)

Teachers;

(B)

Administrators from educational institutions and agencies;

(C)

School mental health professionals;

(D)

Parents, and legal guardians;

(E)

Youth;

(F)

Direct service providers; and

(G)

Advocates.

(2)

In constituting this task force, the Mayor shall consider geographic and socioeconomic diversity as well as other forms of diversity.

(c)

The task force shall:

(1)

Provide guidance to the Mayor on the implementation of this subchapter;

(2)

Within 180 days of September 14, 2012, publicize a model policy, which shall contain each of the components required in § 2-1535.03(b);

(3)

Assist educational institutions and agencies with developing policies in accordance with § 2-1535.03;

(4)

Compile, and make available to each agency, educational institution, and grantee, a list of free or low-cost methods for establishing the bullying prevention programs authorized in § 2-1535.06;

(5)

Within 180 days of receipt of the bullying prevention policies submitted pursuant to § 2-1535.03(c), review each adopted policy for compliance with the requirements of § 2-1535.03(b);

(5A)

Appropriately engage parents and legal guardians of youth served by each agency in bullying prevention efforts;

(5B)

Provide to each agency and parents or legal guardians a referral list of community-based programs or similar resources that mitigate bullying and address identified behavioral health needs as necessary;

(5C)

Provide consultation and review evidence-based school climate data to ensure full implementation of the law; and

(6)

Promulgate guidelines to assist the Mayor in evaluating the effectiveness of the bullying prevention policies that have been established.

(d)

The task force shall disband by August 2018; provided, that at the discretion of the Mayor, a one-year extension may be granted by the Mayor.

Sept. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-167, § 3, 59 DCR 7820
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 4132, 62 DCR 10905
This section is referenced in § 2-1535.03.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added (c)(5A), (5B), and (5C) and made a related change; and substituted “by August 2018” for “2 years after its initial meeting” in (d).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4132 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).